Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1219.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1412. Liens Against Private Property Improved or Renovated with State Appropriations.--(a) If a Commonwealth agency pays to a person under a grant, loan or contract approved by the Commonwealth agency an amount of money appropriated by the Commonwealth and determines that the person used the money to upgrade or renovate property owned, operated or controlled by the person without legal authority to do so, the Commonwealth agency shall notify the person and the Department of Revenue of the amount.(b) Upon receipt of notice under subsection (a), the Department of Revenue shall have the power to recover the amount from the person in the same manner as public accounts and taxes under this article, except as otherwise provided in this section.(c) The amount shall be a debt of the person, recoverable in a civil action in the name of the Commonwealth. The debt, whether sued upon or not, shall be a lien on the improved or renovated property, except as against an innocent purchaser for value without notice of the lien, and shall have priority both in lien and distribution of the improved or renovated property, whether in bankruptcy, insolvency or otherwise. The proceeds of any judgment or order obtained under this section shall be paid to the Department of Revenue.(d) Any amount determined to be due from any person under 20260SB1219PN1553 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303132 this section shall be a lien in favor of the Commonwealth upon the improved or renovated property, but only after the lien has been entered and docketed of record by the prothonotary of the county where the improved or renovated property is situated. The Department of Revenue may at any time transmit to the prothonotaries of the respective counties certified copies of all liens imposed under this section, and prothonotaries receiving the liens shall enter and docket the lien of record in their respective offices, which liens shall be indexed as judgments are now indexed. Notice of the filing and the effect of the lien shall be sent by registered mail to the person who owns the improved or renovated property at the person's last known post office address.(e) The department may not execute on the lien until the improved or renovated property is sold or transferred.(f) The lien imposed under this section shall have priority from the date of its recording and shall be fully paid and satisfied out of the proceeds of any judicial sale of the property subject to the lien, before any other obligation, judgment, claim, lien or estate to which the property may subsequently become subject, except costs of the sale and of the writ upon which the sale was made, and real estate taxes and municipal claims against the property, but shall be subordinate to mortgages and other liens existing and duly recorded or entered of record prior to the recording of the tax lien. In the case of a judicial sale of property subject to a lien imposed under this section upon a lien or claim over which the lien imposed under this section has priority, the sale shall discharge the lien imposed under this section to the extent only that the proceeds are applied to its payment, and the lien shall 20260SB1219PN1553 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 continue in full force and effect as to the balance remaining unpaid.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1219PN1553 - 4 - 123